Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-101] Housing loan programs; evidence
of eligible loan, eligible improvement loan, or eligible project loan.
(a) Each mortgage lender who participates in any housing loan program shall
submit evidence, as deemed satisfactory by the corporation, that eligible
loans, eligible improvement loans, or eligible project loans have been made
from the proceeds of the bonds.

(b) The corporation may inspect the books and
records of the mortgage lenders as may be necessary for the purposes of this
section. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next